bezhta_verb.lexd
PATTERN ImperativeForms_s
# stems with umlaut
VerbRoot(1)[s,аь,-cl] Antipassive[s]? VerbNumber[s]? VerbRoot(2)[s,-cl,аь] [<v>:]  Mood[imp,h,аь] (Mood[prmI,s] > [<prmII>:ъ])? 
VerbRoot(1)[s,0,-cl] Antipassive[s]? VerbNumber[s]? VerbRoot(2)[s,-cl,0] [<v>:]  Mood[imp,h,0] ([:аь] Mood[prmI,s] > [<prmII>:ъ])? 
VerbRoot(1)[s,и,-cl] Antipassive[s]? VerbNumber[s]? VerbRoot(2)[s,-cl,и] [<v>:]  Mood[imp,h,и] (Mood[imp,s,и] | ([<imp>:] [:аь] Mood[prmI,s] > [<prmII>:ъ]))
# gender-agreeing with umlaut
Class | ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[s,аь,cl] Antipassive[s]? VerbRoot(2)[s,cl,аь] [<v>:]  Mood[imp,s,аь] (Mood[prmI,s] > [<prmII>:ъ])?
Class VerbRoot(1)[s,аь,cl] Antipassive[s]? VerbNumber VerbRoot(2)[s,cl,аь] [<v>:]  Mood[imp,s,аь] (Mood[prmI,s] > [<prmII>:ъ])?
Class | ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[s,0,cl] Antipassive[s]? VerbRoot(2)[s,cl,0] [<v>:]  Mood[imp,s,0] ([<imp>:] [:аь] Mood[prmI,s] > [<prmII>:ъ])? 
ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[s,0,cl] Antipassive[s]? VerbNumber VerbRoot(2)[s,cl,c] [<v>:]  Mood[imp,s,0] ([<imp>:] [:аь] Mood[prmI,s] > [<prmII>:ъ])? 
Class | ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[s,и,cl] Antipassive[s]? VerbRoot(2)[s,cl,и] [<v>:]  Mood[imp,s,и] (Mood[imp,s,и] | ([<imp>:] [:аь] Mood[prmI,s] > [<prmII>:ъ]))
ClassPl VerbRoot(1)[s,и,cl] Antipassive[s]? VerbNumber VerbRoot(2)[s,cl,и] [<v>:]  Mood[imp,s,и] (Mood[imp,s,и] | ([<imp>:] [:аь] Mood[prmI,s] > [<prmII>:ъ]))

VerbRootInf(1)[s,а] ClassInfix[s] Antipassive[s]? VerbNumber[s]? VerbRootInf(2)[s,а] [<v>:]  Mood[imp,s,а](Mood[prmI,s] > [<prmII>:ъ])?
VerbRootInf(1)[s,0] ClassInfix[s] Antipassive[s]? VerbNumber[s]? VerbRootInf(2)[s,0] [<v>:]  Mood[imp,s,0](Mood[prmI,s] > [<prmII>:ъ])?


LEXICON VerbNumber 
<pl>:>а[а,h]
<pl>:>ба[ба,h]
<pl>:>ва[ва,h]
<pl>:>йа[йа,h]
<pl>:>аь[аь,s]
<pl>:>баь[баь,s]
<pl>:>ваь[ваь,s]


LEXICON ClassInfix
<m>:>о>[h]
<f>:>и>[h,s]
<nh>:>у>[h]
<m>:>оь>[s]
<nh>:>уь>[s]

LEXICON Causative 
<caus>:>{L}л[l]
<caus>:>{L}лл[ll]

LEXICON Antipassive
<antip>:>ла[h]
<antip>:>лаь[s]
<antip>:>да[h]
<antip>:>даь[s]
<antip>:>ва[h]
<antip>:>ваь[s]
<antip>:>а[h]
<antip>:>аь[s]
<antip>:>йа[h]

#---- Tense ----
LEXICON Past 
<pst>:>{L}йо[h,s,c,v]
<pst>:>ло[l,h]
<pst>:>лоь[l,s]

LEXICON Negation
<neg>:>аъ[neg,h]
<neg>:>аьъ[neg,s]
<neg>:>еъ[h,s,loc]
<neg><pst>:>еъе>ш[pst,h,s]
<neg><pst>:>йъе>ш[pst,h,s]
<neg><prs>:>аъа>с[prs,h] 
<neg><prs>:>аьъаь>ш[prs,s]
<neg><imp>:>ассаъ[imp,h]
<neg><imp>:>аьшшаьъ[imp,s]
<neg><pfv.cvb>:>ечӏе[cvb,h,s]
<neg><pfv.cvb>:>йчӏе[cvb,h,s]

LEXICON Present
<prs>:>ца[l,c,h]
<prs>:>чаь[l,c,s]
<prs>:>ча[l,c,s]
<prs>:>{L}с[v,h]
<prs>:>ш[v,s]

LEXICON Future
<fut>:>ас[h]
<fut>:>аьш[s]

LEXICON Plusquamperfect
<ppf>:>āгьийо[h]
<ppf>:>āьгьийо[s]

#---- Mood ----

LEXICON Mood
<imp>:>а[imp,h,а]
<imp>:>аь[imp,s,аь]
<imp>:[imp,h,s,0]
<imp>:>и[imp,h,s,и]
<proh>:>āкъа[proh]
<vol><neg><prs>:>акъа>ъа>с[opt.neg]
<rog>:>лō[rog]
<prmI>:>ла[prmI,h]
<prmI>:>лаь[prmI,s]
<prmII>:>ъ[prmII]
<prmIII>:>алā[prmIII,h]
<prmIII>:>аьлāь[prmIII,s]
<cond>:>да[cond]
<irr>:>къодā[irr]
<dub>:>лā[dub]
<dub>:>лāъ[dub]
<dub>:>лаъ[dub] # "частица хезитации"
<hyp>:>ле[hyp]

LEXICON Rogative
ало<rog><f>:ало
вале<rog><m>:вале

LEXICON Modal
<pot>:>йлъ
<pot>:>лъ
<pot>:>йцӏ
<pot>:>йчӏ
<vol>:>акъо

#---- Non-finite forms ----

LEXICON Infinitive 
<inf>:>ал[h]
<inf>:>аьл[s]

LEXICON Masdar
<nmlz>:>лъи[pst]
<nmlz>:>ни[st]

LEXICON Participle
<prs.ptsp>:>ца>с[h,prs]
<prs.ptsp><obl>:>ца>ла[h,prs,obl]
<prs.ptsp>:>чаь>ш[s,prs]
<pst.ptsp>:>{L}йо[pst,h,s]
<pst.ptsp><obl>:>{L}йа[pst,h,s,obl]
<pst.ptsp><obl>:>ва[pst,h,s,obl]
<pst.ptsp><obl>:>ла[pst,h,s,obl]
<fut.ptsp>:>лъийо[fut,h,s]

LEXICON Converb
<pfv.cvb>:>на[h,pfv]
<pfv.cvb>:>наь[s,pfv]
<prs.cvb>:>лаъ[h,prs]
<prs.cvb>:>лаьъ[s,prs]
<simul.cvb>:>лъ[h,s,simul]
<simul.cvb>:>лъо[h,s,simul]
<ant.cvb>:>лъол[h,s,ant]
<cvb>:>āлъо[h,s,after]
<cvb>:>āлъол[h,s,before]
<cvb>:>лъегьна[inf,h,s]
<since.cvb>:>с[since,h]
<since.cvb>:>ш[since,s]
<lim.cvb>:>{L}ца[lim,h]
<lim.cvb>:>{L}чаь[lim,s]
<cvb>:>гъа[how,h,s]
<cvb>:>дāл[why,h,s]
<cvb>:>āцо[place,h]
<cvb>:>āьчоь[place,s]
<cvb>:>ъгъа[goal,h,s]

# ---- Discourse ----
LEXICON Question
<q>:>д
<q>:>ди
